Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-107.01
Oaths and affirmations.

Oaths and affirmations may be administered, in all cases whatsoever, by notaries public.

R.S.1866, p. 274;

Laws 1909, c. 92, § 1, p. 388;

R.S.1913, § 5530;

C.S.1922, § 4826;

C.S.1929, § 65-101;

R.S.1943, § 65-101;

Laws 1951, c. 207, § 1, p. 768;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 266;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 65-101;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 38;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 40.